Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.100

Rules implementing course requirements—Temporary exemptions and special alterations from requirements—Competency testing.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the student achievement council, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the course requirements set forth in RCW 28A.230.090. The rules shall include, as the superintendent deems necessary, granting equivalencies for and temporary exemptions from the course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090 and special alterations of the course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090. In developing such rules the superintendent shall recognize the relevance of vocational and applied courses and allow such courses to fulfill in whole or in part the courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090, as determined by the high school or school district in accordance with RCW 28A.230.097.

(2) The rules created under subsection (1) of this section must include provisions for:

(a) Competency testing in lieu of such courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090;

(b) Competency testing in lieu of electives, including computer science electives created under RCW 28A.230.300, provided applicable state learning standards and equivalency requirements are met; and

(c) Demonstration of specific skill proficiency or understanding of concepts through work or experience.

[ 2019 c 180 s 3; 2012 c 229 s 504. Prior: 2006 c 263 s 402; 2006 c 114 s 4; 1991 c 116 s 8; 1990 c 33 s 239; 1985 c 384 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.05.062.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 180: See note following RCW 28A.230.300.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Finding—Intent—2006 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.230.097.